District of Columbia statutes.
19-604.04

Nonexclusivity.

This subchapter does not affect any method of transferring property otherwise permitted under the law of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-230, § 2(b), 59 DCR 13606